Utah statutes.
58-71-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for division action regarding the following are under Section 58-1-401:

(1)  refusing to issue a license to an applicant or refusing to renew the license of a licensee;

(2)  revoking, suspending, restricting, or placing on probation the license of a licensee;

(3)  assessing an administrative penalty; and

(4)  issuing a public or private reprimand to a licensee or issuing a cease and desist order.



Enacted by Chapter 282, 1996 General Session

